apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="спікер__n_m_aa">
<e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="стратегі/я__n_f_nn">
<e>       <p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>єю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>є</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>й</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="судом/а__n_f_nn">
<e>       <p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ою</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>о</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ами</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="тенденці/я__n_f_nn">
<e>       <p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>єю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>є</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>й</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="транспорт__n_m_nn">
<e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="спікер"><i>спікер</i><par n="спікер__n_m_aa"/></e>
<e lm="стратегія"><i>стратегі</i><par n="стратегі/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="судома"><i>судом</i><par n="судом/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="тенденція"><i>тенденці</i><par n="тенденці/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="транспорт"><i>транспорт</i><par n="транспорт__n_m_nn"/></e>
